Tennessee, session 114, HB0593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2109(b)(2), is amended by
deleting "two hundred thousand (200,000) miles" wherever it appears and substituting "two
hundred thirty thousand (230,000) miles".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0593
001864
- 1 -